Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.10
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 81-1108.09 to 81-1108.43, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Division means the state building division charged with the responsibility of statewide facilities planning, facilities construction, and statewide facilities administration, which division shall be a part of and subject to the supervision of the office of the Director of Administrative Services; and

(2) Administrator means the State Building Administrator.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 43.
July 19, 2024